Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 1. Administration.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, §§ 64, 65.

Certainty:
requirements as to certainty and completeness of terms of lease in agreement to lease. 85 ALR3d 414.

Sec. 38.05.005.
Division of lands.

The commissioner shall control and supervise the division of lands created and established under the Department of Natural Resources.
The director has administrative powers and other delegated duties, as prescribed by law or regulation.

History.

(§ 1 art II ch 169 SLA 1959)

Editor’s notes. —

Despite the provisions of this section, the division of lands has been changed administratively to the division of mining, land, and water.

Sec. 38.05.010.
Appointment of director.

The commissioner shall appoint a director.
The director is the executive officer of the division of lands.

History.

(§ 2 art II ch 169 SLA 1959)

Editor’s notes. —

Despite the provisions of this section, the division of lands has been changed administratively to the division of mining, land, and water.

Sec. 38.05.015.
Director serves at pleasure of commissioner.

The director serves at the pleasure of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 3 art II ch 169 SLA 1959)

Sec. 38.05.020.
Authority and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall supervise the administration of the division of lands.

The commissioner may

establish reasonable procedures and adopt reasonable regulations necessary to carry out this chapter and, whenever necessary, issue directives or orders to the director to carry out specific functions and duties; regulations adopted by the commissioner shall be adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act); orders by the commissioner classifying land, issued after January 3, 1959, are not required to be adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act);

enter into agreements considered necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including agreements with federal and state agencies;

review any order or action of the director;

exercise the powers and do the acts necessary to carry out the provisions and objectives of this chapter;

notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this chapter, grant an extension of the time within which payments due on any exploration license, lease, or sale of state land, minerals, or materials may be made, including payment of rental and royalties, on a finding that compliance with the requirements is or was prevented by reason of war, riots, or acts of God;

classify tracts for agricultural uses;

after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

), waive, postpone, or otherwise modify the development requirements of a contract for the sale of agricultural land if

the land is inaccessible by road; or

transportation, marketing, and development costs render the required development uneconomic;

reconvey or relinquish land or an interest in land to the federal government if

the land is described in an amended application for an allotment under 43 U.S.C. 1617; and

the reconveyance or relinquishment is

for the purposes provided in 43 U.S.C. 1617; and

in the best interests of the state;

lead and coordinate all matters relating to the state’s review and authorization of resource development projects;

enter into commercial agreements with a duration of not more than two years for project services related to a North Slope natural gas project;

in consultation with the commissioner of revenue, participate in the negotiation of agreements that include balancing, marketing, disposition of natural gas, and offtake and contracts and development of terms for inclusion in those proposed agreements and contracts associated with a North Slope natural gas project; an agreement or contract negotiated under this paragraph to which the state is a party is not effective unless the legislature authorizes the governor to execute the agreement or contract;

enter into confidentiality agreements to maintain the confidentiality of information related to contract negotiations and contract implementation associated with a North Slope natural gas project; information under those confidentiality agreements is not subject to AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

(Alaska Public Records Act), except that

the terms of a proposed contract that the commissioner presents to the legislature for the purpose of obtaining authorization for the governor to execute are not confidential and must be made available to the public at least 90 days before the proposed effective date for the terms; and

the commissioner may share confidential information obtained under this paragraph with members of the legislature, their agents, and contractors on request under confidentiality agreements, either in committees held in executive session or individually;

consult with the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation in the development of agreements or contracts under (10) or (11) of this subsection for project services related to a gas treatment plant, pipeline, liquefaction facility, marine terminal, or marine transportation services necessary to transport natural gas to market;

in consultation with the commissioner of revenue, take custody of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

and manage the project services and disposition and sale of that gas;

exercise the powers and do the acts necessary to carry out the provisions and objectives of AS 43.90 that relate to this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 art II ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1964; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 1972; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 1982; am § 15 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 1 FSSLA 1996; am § 4 ch 20 SLA 1997; am § 20 ch 81 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2007; am §§ 24, 25 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1984, former (c) of this section was renumbered as AS

38.35.015

.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Department of Natural Resources to consult with the Department of Transportation in the evaluation of existing bridges and infrastructure and bridges and infrastructure constructed to accommodate a gas pipeline resulting from an Alaska liquefied natural gas project and determination whether the bridge or infrastructure could also be constructed for transportation uses, including vehicular traffic, see sec. 72(b),
ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the commissioner to prepare, in consultation with the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, and make available to the legislature a report on a plan and alternatives to make North Slope natural gas available for delivery and use in the state, and recommendations for eliminating or minimizing the risks and liabilities identified in the report, see sec. 73, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.
The report is due “on or before the date a firm transportation services agreement in a North Slope natural gas project to which the state is a party is submitted to the legislature for approval.”

For provision requiring the commissioner of revenue to identify a range of financing options for state acquisition of an ownership interest and participation in a North Slope natural gas project, and to develop a plan and suggested legislation to allow a municipality, regional corporation, or resident of the state to participate as a co-owner in a North Slope natural gas pipeline, and to present both to the legislature at the time the commissioner of natural resources submits the first agreement or contract to the legislature for approval under (b)(11) of this section, see sec. 76, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a provision requiring the parties to a North Slope natural gas project developed under the authority of ch. 14, SLA 2014 to provide periodic briefings to the legislature before the first flow of gas in the project, and requiring that the briefings be accompanied by a written report provided by the department of the amount of money the state may be obligated to pay a third party under an agreement or contract under (b)(10) or (11) of this section if a North Slope natural gas project is terminated before the first flow of gas in the project, see sec. 77, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation to provide to the commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of revenue access to information related to the development of contracts under (b)(10) and (11) of this section, see AS

31.25.090(i)

.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For disposition of royalty oil, gas, or gas liquids, see 11 AAC 3.

For payment of oil and gas royalties, rents, and bonuses, see 11 AAC 4.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

For special provisions, see 11 AAC 20, art. 18.

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For land records system, see 11 AAC 53, art. 1.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

For purchase by contract, see 11 AAC 54, art. 2.

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

For use limitation by classification, see 11 AAC 58, art. 1.

For permits, see 11 AAC 58, art. 2.

For short title and definitions, see 11 AAC 58, art. 4.

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.

For tide and submerged lands, see 11 AAC 62.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For shore fisheries leasing, see 11 AAC 64.

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 66, art. 1.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or lease at auction, see 11 AAC 67, art. 2.

For preference right sales, see 11 AAC 67, art. 3.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.

For installment contracts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 9.

For veterans’ land discounts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 10A.

For land discounts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 11.

For disposal by quitclaim to federal government, see 11 AAC 67, art. 11A.

For definitions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 12.

For escheated real property, see 11 AAC 69.

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For timber and material sale contracts and operations, see 11 AAC 71, art. 2.

For timber and logging requirements, see 11 AAC 71, art. 3.

For unbranded or abandoned timber property sales, see 11 AAC 71, art. 4.

For log brands, see 11 AAC 71, art. 5.

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

For availability of land, see 11 AAC 82, art. 1.

For qualifications, see 11 AAC 82, art. 2.

For acreage limitations, see 11 AAC 82, art. 3.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For noncompetitive procedures, see 11 AAC 82, art. 5.

For royalty products, see 11 AAC 82, art. 7.

For records and reports, see 11 AAC 82, art. 8.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

For net profit share leasing, see 11 AAC 83, art. 2.

For unitization, see 11 AAC 83, art. 3.

For communitization and drilling and development contracts, see 11 AAC 83, art. 4.

For underground storage, see 11 AAC 83, art. 5.

For federal leases and preference rights on Alaska lands, see 11 AAC 83, art. 6.

For work commitment, see 11 AAC 83, art. 7.

For exploration incentive credit, see 11 AAC 83, art. 8.

For exempt lease sales, see 11 AAC 83, art. 9.

For Cook Inlet discovery royalty, see 11 AAC 83, art. 10.

For phosphates, see 11 AAC 84, art. 2.

For oil shale, see 11 AAC 84, art. 3.

For sodium, see 11 AAC 84, art. 4.

For sulphur, see 11 AAC 84, art. 5.

For potassium, see 11 AAC 84, art. 6.

For geothermal leasing, see 11 AAC 84, art. 7.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For competitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 1.

For noncompetitive leasing, see 11 AAC 85, art. 2.

For staking, recording and maintaining claims and leasehold locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 2.

For converted MTRSC locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 3.

For upland mining leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 4.

For prospecting sites, see 11 AAC 86, art. 5.

For offshore permits and leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 6.

For millsites, see 11 AAC 86, art. 7.

For applicability, see 11 AAC 87, art. 1.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

For practice and procedure, see 11 AAC 88.

For zoning district regulations, see 11 AAC 91, art. 2.

For designation of districts, see 11 AAC 91, art. 3.

For definitions, see 11 AAC 91, art. 4.

For appropriation and use of water, see 11 AAC 93, art. 2.

For additional provisions for seismic exploration and stratigraphic tests, see 11 AAC 96, art. 2.

For cooperative management agreements, see 11 AAC 97, art. 7.

For management of Alaska mental health trust land, see 11 AAC 99.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, in (b), added (b)(10) — (13), and redesignated (b)(10) as (b)(14); effective January 1, 2015, added (b)(14) and redesignated former (b)(14) as (b)(15).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 75, SLA 1987 provides that “[a] land management and disposal decision, including a disposal under AS

38.05.057

, AS 38.08, or AS 38.09, or a commercial agricultural project under AS

38.05.020(b)(6)

, made before June 16, 1987, under a classification order under AS

38.05.300

is valid, notwithstanding the adoption of the classification order before the adoption of the regional land use plan, if other requirements of law were met.”

On June 7, 1996, the enactment of CSSB 162(FIN) (Nineteenth Legislature, Second Session), designated as ch. 1, FSSLA 1996, became the subject of a lawsuit relating to the legislative override of the governor’s veto of that bill. On April 16, 1997, the superior court issued a Final Declaratory Judgment stating that the governor’s veto of CSSB 162(FIN) “was not timely overridden by the Alaska Legislature” and that “CSSB 162(FIN) was not enacted into law.”

Honorable Tony Knowles v. Legislative Council

, No. 1JU 96-1276 CI (Sup. Ct. Apr. 16, 1997). On appeal, the Alaska Supreme Court vacated the judgment and directed the superior court to dismiss the action, concluding that the matter was an action brought in the name of the state against the legislature in violation of article III, sec. 16 of the Alaska Constitution.

Legislative Council v. Knowles

, 988 P.2d 604 (Alaska 1999).

The provisions of Section 4, ch. 20, SLA 1997, are given effect. These 1997 provisions are identical to the 1996 provisions of Section 4 of CSSB 162(FIN).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Commissioner may amend leases.
If the commissioner has the authority to lease Alaska lands, as defined in AS

38.05.190

, it should go without saying that he has the authority to amend said lease so long as such amendment is not in contravention of the statutes and regulations. 1967 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

For suggested form of directional drilling clause to be used in Alaska competitive and noncompetitive lease forms, see 1967 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Sec. 38.05.023.
Terms in an agreement or contract related to a North Slope natural gas project.

An agreement or contract to which the state or an entity of the state is a party that is negotiated under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

must include a requirement that the state or an entity of the state shall have access to data developed under the agreement or contract in which the state or an entity of the state has directly participated financially. Access by the state or an entity of the state to the data must be on the same or substantially similar terms applicable to any other party in a North Slope natural gas project.

A proposed agreement or contract associated with a North Slope natural gas project may not include a provision that changes the property tax on property that was previously taxable under AS 43.56.

A proposed agreement or contract associated with a North Slope natural gas project must provide the means for allocating infrastructure costs between the state and other parties in the project. The allocation must take into consideration the extent to which infrastructure is used by the project and used by the public and the difference between the normal expected or actual life-cycle costs for the infrastructure as used by the project and the expected or actual life-cycle costs of the same infrastructure if subject only to general public use. The proposed agreement or contract may not require the state to pay infrastructure costs that are directly related to the project and not designed for general public use in a proportionate amount that is greater than the state’s share of participation in the project.

An agreement or contract to which the state or an entity of the state is a party that is negotiated under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

must include principles based on commercially reasonable terms for delivering natural gas to public utilities in the state when the demand for natural gas by the utilities exceeds the amount of the state’s royalty natural gas and natural gas delivered to the state as payment of tax that is available in a North Slope natural gas project.

History.

(§ 26 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 83, ch. 14, SLA 2014 makes this section effective January 1, 2015.

Sec. 38.05.025.
Continuing regulations, agreements, etc.

All rules, regulations, procedures, funds, contracts, and agreements established or entered into by the Department of Lands before May 2, 1959, under the authority of ch. 126, SLA 1953, as amended, and ch. 184, SLA 1957, are continued, and are subject to amendment by the commissioner except where inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 art XIII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Sec. 38.05.027.
Cooperative resource management or development agreements.

Consistent with the authority of the commissioner under law, the commissioner, after determining that the agreement is in the best interests of the public and the state, may enter into cooperative resource management or development agreements with the federal government, a state agency, a village or municipality, or a person. Specific guidelines to protect the state and public interest shall be established, if necessary, by the commissioner before entering into an agreement under this section.

A summary of agreements entered into under this section shall be submitted to the legislature within five days of the beginning of each regular session.

History.

(§ 2 ch 143 SLA 1976; am § 15 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

Sec. 38.05.030.
Exceptions.

[Repealed, § 88 ch 152 SLA 1984.]

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any power, duty or authority now or in the future granted to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities in the name of the state, to acquire, use, lease, dispose of, or exchange real property, or any interest in real property. Land assigned by the division of lands to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall be returned to the management of the division of lands when it is no longer needed for the purposes assigned.

The agencies referred to in (b) of this section and other state agencies with authority to acquire or dispose of land shall give written notification of the fact of acquisition, lease, disposal, or exchange to the commissioner within three months after the date that they make the acquisition, lease, disposal, or exchange.

Except for land that is required to be returned to the department under (b) of this section, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may dispose of real property acquired by it under AS

02.15.070

, AS

19.05.040

(1) and (2),

19.05.080

—

19.05.120

, AS

35.05.040

(1) and (2), and AS

35.20.010

—

35.20.050

. Land conveyed under this section to a municipality for less than fair market value shall be credited against the municipality’s entitlement under AS 29.65.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 182 SLA 1978.]

Land owned by the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska is not subject to this chapter.

This chapter does not authorize the commissioner or any employee of the department to acquire title to real property through the use of lease-purchase agreements or lease-financing agreements in which the department is the lessor. For purposes of this section, “lease-purchase agreement” and “lease-financing agreement” have the meanings given those terms in AS

36.30.990

.

History.

(§ 3(a) — (d) art XIII ch 169 SLA 1959; am §§ 20, 21 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 253 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 35 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 240 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 267 SLA 1976; am § 20 ch 182 SLA 1978; am §§ 16 — 18, 88 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1994; am § 10 ch 75 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For exploration incentive credit, see 11 AAC 83, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective November 8, 2016, in (c), deleted “In addition to the requirements specified in AS

38.50.090

, the” at the beginning of the first sentence; made a related change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The division of lands is the proper agency for acceptance of title to land transferred by the federal government.
The division of aviation in the (former) Department of Public Works possesses the authority to manage the granted land for airport and directly related purposes while the division of lands possesses the authority to manage the land for other public purposes.
April 14, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

Transfer by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities (DOT/PF) of lands conveyed by the United States to the state to any entity other than the State of Alaska, Department of Natural Resources (DNR) would be illegal under state law.
This does not preclude DOT/PF from negotiating jointly with DNR some type of exchange with another entity. April 25, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.032.
School land disposition procedures. [Repealed, § 20 ch 182 SLA 1978.]